Illinois, session 104th, HB2362.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by adding 5Section 3-699.26 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/3-699.26 new)7    Sec. 3-699.26. Air Medal license plates.8    (a) Beginning with the 2027 registration year, the 9Secretary of State, upon receipt of all applicable fees and 10applications made in the form prescribed by the Secretary, may 11issue special registration plates designated as Air Medal 12plates to residents of the State who have been awarded the Air 13Medal by the United States Armed Forces. The special plates 14issued under this Section shall be affixed only to passenger 15vehicles of the first division, motorcycles, autocycles, and 16motor vehicles of the second division weighing not more than 178,000 pounds. Plates under this Section shall expire according 18to the multi-year procedure established by Section 3-414.1 of 19this Code. 20    (b) The plates shall display the Air Medal. In all other 21respects, the design and color of the special plates shall be 22wholly within the discretion of the Secretary. Appropriate 23documentation, as determined by the Secretary, shall accompany   HB2362 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10034 LNS 20105 b1each application. The Secretary may, in his or her discretion, 2allow the plates to be issued as vanity plates or personalized 3in accordance with Section 3-405.1 of this Code. The plates 4are not required to designate "Land of Lincoln", as prescribed 5in subsection (b) of Section 3-412 of this Code. The Secretary 6shall prescribe the eligibility requirements and, in his or 7her discretion, shall approve and prescribe stickers or decals 8as provided under Section 3-412.